District of Columbia statutes.
38-841.08

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History

Oct. 21, 2015, D.C. Law 21-29, § 9, 62 DCR 10884